Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 1.2. Virginia Housing Development Authority Act.
§ 36-55.36.
Terms and conditions of mortgage insurance.

For mortgage payments to be eligible for insurance under the provisions of this chapter, the underlying mortgage loan shall: (a) be one which is made to and held by a mortgagee approved by HDA as responsible and able to service the mortgage properly; (b) not exceed (i) 100% of the estimated cost of such proposed housing development if owned or to be owned by a nonprofit mortgagor or if owned by a person or family of low or moderate income, in the case of a single-family dwelling or condominium; or, (ii) 95% of the estimated cost of the proposed housing development if owned or to be owned by any other mortgagor; (c) have a maturity satisfactory to HDA but in no case longer than 80% of HDA’s estimate of the remaining useful life of said housing or 40 years from the date of the issuance of insurance, whichever is earlier; (d) contain amortization provisions satisfactory to HDA requiring periodic payments by the mortgagor not in excess of his reasonable ability to pay as determined by HDA; (e) be in such form and contain such terms and provisions with respect to maturity, property insurance, repairs, alterations, payment of taxes and assessments, default reserves, delinquency charges, default remedies, anticipation of maturity, additional and secondary liens, equitable and legal redemption rights, prepayment privileges and other matters as HDA may prescribe.

All applications for mortgage insurance shall be forwarded, together with an application fee prescribed by HDA, to the executive director of HDA. HDA shall cause an investigation of the proposed housing to be made, review the application and the report of the investigation, and approve or deny the application. No application shall be approved unless HDA finds that it is consistent with the purposes of this chapter and further finds that the financing plan for the proposed housing is sound. HDA shall notify the applicant and the proposed lender of its decision. Any such approval shall be conditioned upon payment to HDA, within such reasonable time and after notification of approval as may be specified by HDA, of the commitment fee prescribed by HDA.

HDA shall fix mortgage insurance premiums for the insurance of mortgage payments under the provisions of this chapter. Such premiums shall be computed as a percentage of the principal of the mortgage outstanding at the beginning of each mortgage year, but shall not be more than one-half of one per centum per year of such principal amount. The amount of premium need not be uniform for all insured loans. Such premiums shall be payable by mortgagors or mortgagees in such manner as prescribed by HDA.

In the event of default by the mortgagor, the mortgagee shall notify HDA both of the default and the mortgagee’s proposed course of action. When it appears feasible, HDA may for a temporary period upon default or threatened default by the mortgagor authorize mortgage payments to be made by HDA to the mortgagee which payments shall be repaid under such conditions as HDA may prescribe. HDA may also agree to revised terms of financing when such appear prudent. The mortgagee shall be entitled to receive the benefits of the insurance provided herein upon: (a) Any sale of the mortgaged property by court order in foreclosure or a sale with the consent of HDA by the mortgagor or a subsequent owner of the property or by the mortgagee after foreclosure or acquisition by deed in lieu of foreclosure, provided all claims of the mortgagee against the mortgagor or others arising from the mortgage, foreclosure, or any deficiency judgment shall be assigned to HDA without recourse except such claims as may have been released with the consent of HDA; or (b) the expiration of six months after the mortgagee has taken title to the mortgaged property under judgment of strict foreclosure, foreclosure by sale or other judicial sale, or under a deed in lieu of foreclosure if during such period the mortgagee has made a bona fide attempt to sell the property, and thereafter conveys the property to HDA with an assignment, without recourse, to HDA of all claims of the mortgagee against the mortgagor or others arising out of the mortgage foreclosure, or deficiency judgment; or (c) the acceptance by HDA of title to the property or an assignment of the mortgage, without recourse to HDA, in the event HDA determines it imprudent to proceed under (a) or (b) above. Upon the occurrence of either (a), (b) or (c) hereof, the obligation of the mortgagee to pay premium charges for insurance shall cease, and HDA shall, within thirty days thereafter, pay to the mortgagee ninety-eight percent of the sum of (i) the then unpaid principal balance of the insured indebtedness, (ii) the unpaid interest to the date of conveyance or assignment to HDA, as the case may be, (iii) the amount of all payments made by the mortgagee for which it has not been reimbursed for taxes, insurance, assessments and mortgage insurance premiums, and (iv) such other necessary fees, costs or expenses of the mortgagee as may be approved by HDA.

Upon request of the mortgagee, HDA may at any time, under such terms and conditions as it may prescribe, consent to the release of the mortgagor from his liability or consent to the release of parts of the property from the lien of the mortgage, or approve a substitute mortgagor or sale of the property or part thereof.

No claim for the benefit of the insurance provided in this chapter shall be accepted by HDA except within one year after any sale or acquisition of title of the mortgaged premises described in subdivision (a) or (b) of subsection (4) of this section.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1975, c. 536.

§ 36-55.36:1.
Power to create insurance funds and form corporations for the purpose of insuring HDA mortgage loans.

HDA shall have the power to create one or more insurance funds and to form one or more corporations for the purpose of providing replacement mortgage guaranty insurance, upon such terms and conditions as HDA shall prescribe, on mortgage loans made or financed by HDA pursuant to this chapter for which (i) mortgage guaranty insurance is being provided by a company which, subsequent to the provision of such coverage, has experienced a drop in rating by a nationally recognized credit rating service which could result in a rating for the bonds which would be in nonconformance with the rating covenants of the related bond indenture; and (ii) the executive director of HDA executes an affidavit stating that HDA was unable, after diligent effort, to procure replacement mortgage guaranty insurance in a form and premium acceptable to HDA from another insurer licensed in this Commonwealth to transact mortgage guaranty insurance business.
For purposes of this section, “diligent effort” means a good faith search by HDA for mortgage guaranty insurance among admitted insurers resulting in declinations of coverage, by three unaffiliated insurers licensed and authorized in this Commonwealth to write the mortgage guaranty insurance coverage sought, at a premium equal to or less than the premium in force for the loans made or financed by HDA.
HDA may provide financing and other funding to any such fund or corporation and may exercise all necessary or convenient rights and powers and perform all requisite duties and obligations relating thereto.
Any such fund or corporation shall be subject to the direction and control of the commissioners of HDA and shall have such powers and duties as the commissioners of HDA shall prescribe.
Any such fund or corporation may charge such premiums and may establish such reserves as HDA shall specify.
HDA may specify that any such reserves shall be assets of such fund or corporation and shall not be subject to the claims of creditors of HDA.
Any such fund or corporation, its directors, officers and employees, its assets and operations, and its policies of insurance and the premiums therefor shall not be subject to the provisions of Title 38.2 and rules and regulations issued pursuant thereto.
The property of any such fund or corporation and its income and operations shall be exempt from taxation or assessments of every kind by the Commonwealth and all municipalities and other political subdivisions thereof.
The provisions of §

36-55.36

shall not be applicable to mortgage guaranty insurance provided under this section.

History.

1990, c. 956.

§ 36-55.37.
Exemption from taxation.

As set forth in the declaration of finding and purpose herein, HDA will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it by this chapter, and the notes and bonds of HDA issued and to be issued pursuant to this chapter, the transfer thereof, and the income therefrom including any profit made on the sale thereof and all its fees, charges, gifts, grants, revenues, receipts, and other moneys received, pledged to pay or secure the payment of such notes or bonds shall at all times be free from taxation and assessment of every kind by the Commonwealth and by the municipalities and all other political subdivisions of the Commonwealth.

The property of HDA and its income and operations shall be exempt from taxation or assessments upon any property acquired or used by HDA under the provisions of this chapter.

Any housing development, residential housing or nonhousing building financed in whole or in part pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and owned by HDA shall be exempt from all property taxation and special assessments of the Commonwealth or political subdivisions thereof; provided, however, that in lieu of such taxes, HDA may agree to make such payments to the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof as HDA finds consistent with the cost of supplying municipal services to the housing development, residential housing or nonhousing building and maintaining the economic feasibility of the housing development, residential housing or nonhousing building, which payments such bodies are hereby authorized to accept.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1974, c. 263; 2004, c. 187.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 187, in subsection (3), inserted “residential housing or nonhousing building” twice and substituted “residential housing or nonhousing building” for “for persons and families of low and moderate income” near the end.

§ 36-55.37:1.
Repealed by Acts 1996, c. 298.

§ 36-55.38.
Admission and income limitations relative to housing developments.

Admission to housing developments financed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be limited to persons or families of low or moderate income and, in the case of economically mixed projects, such other persons and families as the HDA shall determine, subject to the limitation in subsection C of §

36-55.30:2

.

HDA shall make and publish rules and regulations from time to time governing the terms of tenant selection plans and income limits for tenants eligible to occupy housing developments assisted by HDA in conformance with the provisions of this chapter and such income limits may vary with the size and circumstances of the person or family.

HDA shall by rules and regulations provide income standards for continued residence in housing developments assisted by HDA, and either HDA, or with its approval the housing sponsor of any such housing development may terminate the tenancy or interest of any person or family residing in any such housing development whose gross aggregate income exceeds prescribed income standards for a period of six months or more; provided, that no tenancy or interest of any such person or family in any such housing development shall be terminated except upon reasonable notice and opportunity to obtain suitable alternate housing, in accordance with rules and regulations of HDA; provided further, that any such person or family, with the approval of HDA, shall be permitted to continue to occupy the unit, subject to payment of a rent or carrying charges or surcharge to the housing sponsor in accordance with a schedule of surcharges fixed by HDA.

Any person or family residing in a housing development which shall be a cooperative and is required to be removed from the housing development because of excessive income as herein provided shall be discharged from liability on any note, bond or other evidence of indebtedness relating thereto and shall be reimbursed, in accordance with the rules of HDA, for all sums paid by such person or family to the housing sponsor on account of the purchase of stock or debentures as a condition of occupancy or on account of the acquisition of title for such purpose.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1975, c. 536; 1996, c. 498; 2004, c. 187.

The 1996 amendment

inserted “and, in the case of economically mixed projects or housing units within housing rehabilitation districts, such other persons and families as the HDA shall determine” at the end of subsection (1).

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 187, in subsection (1), deleted “or housing units within housing rehabilitation districts” following “mixed projects” and inserted “subject to the limitation in subsection C of §

36-55.30:2

.”

§ 36-55.39.
Procedure prior to financing of housing developments undertaken by housing sponsors.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, HDA is not empowered to finance any housing development undertaken by a housing sponsor pursuant to §§

36-55.31

,

36-55.33:1

and

36-55.34:1

of this chapter unless, prior to the financing of any housing development hereunder, the commissioners or the executive director of HDA find:

That there exists a shortage of decent, safe and sanitary housing at rentals or prices which persons and families of low income or moderate income can afford within the general housing market area to be served by the proposed housing development.

That private enterprise and investment have been unable, without assistance, to provide the needed decent, safe and sanitary housing at rentals or prices which persons or families of low and moderate income can afford or to provide sufficient mortgage financing for residential housing for occupancy by such persons or families.

That the housing sponsor or sponsors undertaking the proposed housing development in the Commonwealth will supply well-planned, well-designed housing for persons or families of low and moderate income and, in the case of an economically mixed project, other persons and families and that such sponsors are financially responsible.

That the housing development, to be assisted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, will be of public use and will provide a public benefit.

That the housing development will be undertaken within the authority conferred by this chapter upon HDA and the housing sponsor or sponsors.

The locality, upon written request from the housing sponsor, shall provide a written staff determination that the proposed development is consistent with current zoning and other land use regulations in effect at the time of such request. Failure of the locality to comply with this subsection within 30 days of the receipt of the written request from the housing sponsor shall be deemed to be a determination that the proposed development is consistent with current zoning and other land use regulations. Prior to financing by the HDA, the housing sponsor shall provide the HDA with (i) a copy of the written staff determination received from the locality, (ii) a written certification that the locality failed to respond to the housing sponsor’s request within 30 days as provided herein, or (iii) a copy of any building permit issued by the locality.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1975, c. 536; 1978, c. 297; 1982, c. 175; 1990, c. 461; 1995, c. 215; 1996, c. 560; 1997, c. 684; 2004, c. 187.

The 1995 amendment

substituted “the commissioners of HDA find” for “HDA finds” in subsection A; substituted “the” for “this” preceding “Commonwealth” in subdivision A 3; and, in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted “The executive director of” and deleted “also” preceding “find”; added the present second sentence; and, in the present third sentence, deleted “so” preceding “certified” and inserted “the executive director of” preceding “HDA shall”.

The 1996 amendment,

in subsection B, deleted the clause (i) designation, deleted “or” following “or other applicable land use regulations,” and deleted clause (ii), which read: “is not consistent with the local Comprehensive Housing Affordability Strategy,” and added subsection C.

The 1997 amendment,

in subsection A, inserted “or the executive director” following “the commissioners”; rewrote subsection B; and deleted former subsection C which read: “Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the certification of disapproval shall not be effective unless written notification of (i) the staff recommendation is sent to the applicant for the proposed financing on or before the date on which the staff recommendation is sent to the governing body or (ii) the governing body’s intent to consider such disapproval, where there is no staff recommendation, is sent to such applicant at least fifteen calendar days prior to its decision. Such notice shall be sent to the applicant at the address specified in HDA’s written notification. In the event of a failure to send the notice required by this subsection, the executive director shall, for the purposes of making the finding required by subsection B, disregard such certification of disapproval.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 187 inserted “and, in the case of an economically mixed project, other persons and families” in subdivision A 3 and substituted “30” for “thirty” twice in subsection B.

§ 36-55.40.
Notes and bonds.

HDA shall have power and is hereby authorized to issue from time to time its negotiable notes and bonds in conformity with applicable provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code in such principal amount as HDA shall determine to be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving any of its corporate purposes, including the payment of interest on notes and bonds of HDA, establishment of reserves to secure such notes and bonds, and all other expenditures of HDA incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers. In accordance with §

2.2-5002

, such power to issue notes and bonds shall not be restricted or limited solely because the interest on the notes and bonds is subject, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, to federal income taxes.
A. 1. HDA shall have power and is hereby authorized to issue from time to time its negotiable notes and bonds in conformity with applicable provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code in such principal amount as HDA shall determine to be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving any of its corporate purposes, including the payment of interest on notes and bonds of HDA, establishment of reserves to secure such notes and bonds, and all other expenditures of HDA incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers. In accordance with §

2.2-5002

, such power to issue notes and bonds shall not be restricted or limited solely because the interest on the notes and bonds is subject, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, to federal income taxes.

HDA shall have the power, from time to time, to issue (i) notes to renew notes and (ii) bonds, to pay notes, including the interest thereon and, whenever it deems refunding expedient, to refund any bonds by the issuance of new bonds, whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured, and to issue bonds partly to refund bonds then outstanding and partly for any of its corporate purposes. The refunding bonds may be (i) exchanged for the bonds to be refunded or (ii) sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase, redemption or payment of such bonds.

Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by HDA, every issue of its notes and bonds shall be general obligations of HDA payable out of any revenues or moneys of HDA, subject only to any agreements with the holders of particular notes or bonds pledging any particular revenues.

The notes and bonds shall be authorized by resolution or resolutions of HDA, shall bear such date or dates and shall mature at such time or times as such resolution or resolutions may provide, except that no bond shall mature more than fifty years from the date of its issue. The bonds may be issued as serial bonds payable in annual installments or as term bonds or as a combination thereof. The notes and bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption as such resolution or resolutions may provide. The notes and bonds of HDA may be sold by HDA, at public or private sale, at such price or prices as HDA shall determine.

Any resolution or resolutions authorizing any notes or bonds or any issue thereof may contain provisions, which shall be a part of the contract or contracts with the holders thereof, as to:

Pledging all or any part of the revenues to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of any issue thereof, subject to such agreements with noteholders or bondholders as may then exist;

Pledging all or any part of the assets of HDA, including mortgages and obligations securing the same, to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of any issue of notes or bonds, subject to such agreements with noteholders or bondholders as may then exist;

The use and disposition of the gross income from mortgages owned by HDA and payment of principal of mortgages owned by HDA;

The setting aside of reserves or sinking funds and the regulation and disposition thereof;

Limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of notes or bonds may be applied and pledging such proceeds to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of any issue thereof;

Limitations on the issuance of additional notes or bonds; the terms upon which additional notes or bonds may be issued and secured; and the refunding of outstanding or other notes or bonds;

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with noteholders or bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of notes or bonds the holders of which must consent thereto; and the manner in which such consent may be given;

Limitations on the amount of moneys to be expended by HDA for operating expenses of HDA;

Vesting in a trustee or trustees such property, rights, powers and duties in trust as HDA may determine, which may include any or all of the rights, powers and duties of the trustee appointed by the bondholders pursuant to this chapter and limiting or abrogating the right of the bondholders to appoint a trustee under this chapter or limiting the rights, powers and duties of such trustee;

Defining the acts or omissions to act which shall constitute a default in the obligations and duties of HDA to the holders of the notes or bonds and providing for the rights and remedies of the holders of the notes or bonds in the event of such default, including as a matter of right the appointment of a receiver; provided, however, that such rights and remedies shall not be inconsistent with the general laws of the Commonwealth and the other provisions of this chapter;

Any other matters, of like or different character, which in any way affect the security or protection of the holders of the notes or bonds.

Any pledge made by HDA shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; HDA’s interest, then existing or thereafter obtained, in the revenues, moneys, mortgage loans, receivables, contract rights or other property or proceeds so pledged shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery or further act, and the lien of such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against HDA, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded, nor shall any filing be required with respect thereto.

Neither the commissioners of HDA nor any other person executing such notes or bonds shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

HDA, subject to such agreements with noteholders or bondholders as may then exist, shall have power out of any funds available therefor to purchase notes or bonds of HDA, which shall thereupon be cancelled unless HDA shall provide written notification to the trustee pursuant to subsection J, at a price not exceeding:

If the notes or bonds are then redeemable, the redemption price then applicable plus accrued interest to the next interest payment thereon, or

If the notes or bonds are not then redeemable, the redemption price applicable on the first date after such purchase upon which the notes or bonds become subject to redemption plus accrued interest to such date.

In the discretion of HDA, the bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between HDA and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the power of a trust company within or without the Commonwealth. Such trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of HDA in relation to the exercise of its corporate powers and the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys. HDA may provide by such trust indenture for the payment of the proceeds of the bonds and the revenues to the trustee under such trust indenture or other depository, and for the method of disbursement thereof, with such safeguards and restrictions as it may determine. All expenses incurred in carrying out such trust indenture may be treated as a part of the operating expenses of HDA. If the bonds shall be secured by a trust indenture, the bondholders shall have no authority to appoint a separate trustee to represent them.

Whether or not the notes and bonds are of such form and character as to be negotiable instruments under the terms of the Uniform Commercial Code, the notes and bonds are hereby made negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for all the purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code, subject only to the provisions of the notes and bonds for registration.

In case any of the commissioners or officers of HDA whose signatures appear on any notes or bonds or coupons shall cease to be such commissioners or officers before the delivery of such notes or bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such commissioners or officers had remained in office until such delivery.

Notwithstanding any statute or case law to the contrary, the purchase or actual or constructive ownership by HDA of any of its notes or bonds with the intent that such notes or bonds remain outstanding, as evidenced by written notification from HDA to the trustee under the resolution or trust indenture, shall not cause such notes or bonds or the indebtedness evidenced thereby to be canceled or extinguished, subject to such terms and conditions as may be set forth in the written notification and except as may be otherwise provided in the resolution or trust indenture.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1978, c. 189; 1996, c. 298; 1998, c. 442.

The 1996 amendment

redesignated former subdivisions (1)(a) through (1)(c) as present subdivisions A 1 through A 3, redesignated former subsections (2) through (9) as present subsections B through I, redesignated former subdivisions (3)(a) through (3)(k) as present subdivisions C 1 through C 11, redesignated former subdivisions (6)(a) and (6)(b) as present subdivisions F 1 and F 2, and added the second sentence in present subdivision A 1.

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection F, in the introductory language, inserted “unless HDA shall provide written notification to the trustee pursuant to subsection J” and added subsection J.

§ 36-55.41.
Reserve funds and appropriations.

HDA may create and establish one or more special funds (herein referred to as “capital reserve funds”), and shall pay into each such capital reserve fund (i) any moneys appropriated and made available by the Commonwealth for the purpose of such fund, (ii) any proceeds of sale of notes or bonds, to the extent provided in the resolution or resolutions of HDA authorizing the issuance thereof, and (iii) any other moneys which may be made available to HDA for the purpose of such fund from any other source or sources. All moneys held in any capital reserve fund, except as hereinafter provided, shall be used, as required, solely for the payment of the principal of bonds secured in whole or in part by such fund or of the sinking fund payments hereinafter mentioned with respect to such bonds, the purchase or redemption of such bonds, the payment of interest on such bonds or the payment of any redemption premium required to be paid when such bonds are redeemed prior to maturity; however, if moneys in any such fund at any time are less than the minimum capital reserve fund requirement established for such fund as hereinafter provided, HDA shall not use such moneys for any optional purchase or redemption of such bonds. Any income or interest earned by, or increment to, any capital reserve fund due to the investment thereof may be transferred by HDA to other funds or accounts of HDA to the extent it does not reduce the amount of such capital reserve fund below the minimum capital reserve fund requirement for such fund;
A. 1. HDA may create and establish one or more special funds (herein referred to as “capital reserve funds”), and shall pay into each such capital reserve fund (i) any moneys appropriated and made available by the Commonwealth for the purpose of such fund, (ii) any proceeds of sale of notes or bonds, to the extent provided in the resolution or resolutions of HDA authorizing the issuance thereof, and (iii) any other moneys which may be made available to HDA for the purpose of such fund from any other source or sources. All moneys held in any capital reserve fund, except as hereinafter provided, shall be used, as required, solely for the payment of the principal of bonds secured in whole or in part by such fund or of the sinking fund payments hereinafter mentioned with respect to such bonds, the purchase or redemption of such bonds, the payment of interest on such bonds or the payment of any redemption premium required to be paid when such bonds are redeemed prior to maturity; however, if moneys in any such fund at any time are less than the minimum capital reserve fund requirement established for such fund as hereinafter provided, HDA shall not use such moneys for any optional purchase or redemption of such bonds. Any income or interest earned by, or increment to, any capital reserve fund due to the investment thereof may be transferred by HDA to other funds or accounts of HDA to the extent it does not reduce the amount of such capital reserve fund below the minimum capital reserve fund requirement for such fund;

HDA shall not at any time issue bonds, secured in whole or in part by a capital reserve fund, if upon the issuance of such bonds, the amount of such capital reserve fund will be less than the minimum capital reserve fund requirement of such fund, unless HDA, at the time of issuance of such bonds, shall deposit in such fund from the proceeds of the bonds to be issued, or from other sources, an amount which, together with the amount then in such fund, will not be less than the minimum capital reserve fund requirement for such fund. For purposes of this section, the term “minimum capital reserve fund requirement” shall mean, as of any particular date of computation, an amount of money, as provided in the resolutions of HDA authorizing the bonds with respect to which such fund is established, equal to not more than the greatest of the respective amounts, for the current or any future fiscal year of HDA, of annual debt service on the bonds of HDA secured in whole or in part by such fund, such annual debt service for any fiscal year being the amount of money equal to the aggregate of (i) all interest payable during such fiscal year on all bonds secured in whole or in part by such fund outstanding on the date of computation, plus (ii) the principal amount of all such bonds outstanding on said date of computation which mature during such fiscal year, plus (iii) all amounts specified in any resolution of the authority authorizing any of such bonds as payable during such fiscal year as a sinking fund payment with respect to any of such bonds which mature after such fiscal year, all calculated on the assumption that such bonds will after said date of computation cease to be outstanding by reason, but only by reason, of the payment of bonds when due, and the payment when due and application in accordance with the resolution authorizing those bonds, of all of such sinking fund payments payable at or after said date of computation; however, in computing the annual debt service for any fiscal year as aforesaid, bonds deemed to have been paid in accordance with the defeasance provisions of the resolution or resolutions of HDA authorizing the issuance thereof shall not be included in bonds outstanding on the date of computation aforesaid;

In computing the amount of any capital reserve funds for the purpose of this section, securities in which all or a portion of such funds shall be invested shall be valued at par or if purchased at less than par, at their cost to HDA;

To assure the continued operation and solvency of HDA for the carrying out of its corporate purposes, provision is made in subdivision 1 of this subsection for the accumulation in each capital reserve fund of an amount equal to the minimum capital reserve fund requirement for such fund.

In order further to assure the maintenance of the foregoing capital reserve funds, the chairman of HDA shall annually, on or before December 1, make and deliver to the Governor and Director of the Budget his certificate stating the sum, if any, required to restore each such capital reserve fund to the minimum capital reserve fund requirement for such fund. Within five days after the beginning of each session of the General Assembly, the Governor shall submit to the presiding officer of each house printed copies of a budget including the sum, if any, required to restore each such capital reserve fund to the minimum capital reserve fund requirement for such fund. All sums appropriated by the legislature for such restoration and paid shall be deposited by HDA in the applicable capital reserve fund.

HDA shall create and establish such other fund or funds as may be necessary or desirable for its corporate purposes.

All amounts paid over to HDA by the Commonwealth pursuant to the provisions of this section shall constitute and be accounted for as advances by the Commonwealth to HDA and, subject to the rights of the holders of any bonds or notes of HDA theretofore or thereafter issued, shall be repaid to the Commonwealth without interest from all available operating revenues of HDA in excess of amounts required for the payment of bonds, notes or other obligations of HDA, the capital reserve funds and operating expenses.

The outstanding principal amount of notes and bonds issued by HDA secured by capital reserve funds pursuant to this section, other than notes and bonds for which refunding obligations shall have been issued pursuant to §

36-55.42

, shall not exceed $1.5 billion. For the purpose of this subdivision, the outstanding principal amount of notes or bonds issued by HDA at a price less than the face amount thereof shall be deemed to be the issue price of such notes or bonds.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1974, c. 263; 1987, c. 451; 1994, c. 378; 1997, c. 41.

The 1997 amendment

redesignated former subdivisions (1) (a) through (1) (d) as present subdivisions A 1 through A 4; redesignated former subsections (2) through (5) as present subsections B through E; substituted the clause (i), (ii) and (iii) designators for the former clause (1), (2) and (3) designators in present subdivision A 1; substituted “subdivision 1 of this subsection” for “subdivision (a) of this subsection” in present subdivision A 4; and substituted “$1.5 billion” for “$1.3 billion” at the end of the first sentence in present subsection E.

§ 36-55.42.
Refunding obligations; issuance.

HDA may provide for the issuance of refunding obligations for the purpose of refunding any obligations then outstanding which have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such obligations and for any corporate purpose of HDA. The issuance of such obligations, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties and obligations of the HDA in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter which relate to the issuance of obligations, insofar as such provisions may be appropriate therefor.

History.

1972, c. 830.

§ 36-55.43.
Same; sale.

Refunding obligations issued as provided in §

36-55.42

may be sold or exchanged for outstanding obligations issued under this chapter and, if sold, the proceeds thereof may be applied, in addition to any other authorized purposes, to the purchase, redemption or payment of such outstanding obligations. Pending the application of the proceeds of any such refunding obligations, with any other available funds, to the payment of the principal, accrued interest and any redemption premium on the obligations being refunded, and, if so provided or permitted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such refunding obligations or in the trust agreement securing the same, to the payment of any interest on such refunding obligations and any expenses in connection with such refunding, such proceeds may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by the United States of America, which proceeds shall mature or which shall be subject to redemption by the holders thereof, at the option of such holders, not later than the respective dates when the proceeds, together with the interest accruing thereon, will be required for the purposes intended.

History.

1972, c. 830.